Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE A. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 611. LODGING, MEAL, AND TRAVEL REIMBURSEMENT

Sec. 611.001. LODGING AND MEAL EXPENSES. (a) An officer or employee of the state or of a political subdivision, including any special-purpose district or authority, may be reimbursed with public funds for lodging or meal expenses only to the extent the expenses are reasonable and necessary under guidelines issued by the Texas Ethics Commission.

(b) This section does not apply if the expenses are restricted by other law.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 611.002. COMMON CARRIER FARES. An officer or employee described by Section 611.001 may not be reimbursed for transportation expenses on a common carrier in an amount exceeding the lowest available fare.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.